District of Columbia statutes.
47-2513

Rules and regulations.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-95, § 404, 27 DCR 3509
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2513.